South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S783.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  This act may be cited as the "South Carolina Prenatal Equal Protection Act.". SECTION 2.A.  Article 1, Chapter 3, Title 16 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 16-3-6.  As used in this article: (1) "Fertilization" means the fusion of a human spermatozoon with a human ovum. (2) "Person" includes an unborn child at every stage of development from fertilization until birth. (3) "Spontaneous miscarriage" means the natural or accidental termination of pregnancy and the expulsion of the unborn child. B. Article 1, Chapter 3, Title 16 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 16-3-105.  Where the victim is an unborn child and the defendant is the child's mother, it is a defense to prosecution under this article that the mother engaged in the proscribed conduct because she was compelled to do so by the threat of imminent death or great bodily injury. Section 16-3-106.  In a prosecution under this article where the victim is an unborn child, unless specifically provided otherwise: (1) enforcement is subject to the same presumptions, defenses, justifications, laws of parties, immunities, and clemencies as would apply to the homicide of a person who had been born alive; (2) solicitors and the Attorney General shall have concurrent authority to prosecute criminal cases and to perform any duty that necessarily relates to such prosecution; and (3) this article prevails over other law to the extent of any conflict. Section 16-3-107.  (A) This article shall not apply to the unintentional death of an unborn child when resulting from: (1) the undertaking of life-saving procedures to save the life of a mother when accompanied by reasonable steps, if available, to save the life of her unborn child; or (2) a spontaneous miscarriage. (B) Mistake or unintentional error on the part of a licensed physician or other licensed healthcare provider or his or her employee or agent or any person acting on behalf of the patient shall not subject the licensed physician or other licensed healthcare provider or person acting on behalf of the patient to any criminal liability under this article. Section 16-3-108.  Any person may be compelled to testify in any action or prosecution initiated pursuant to this article where the victim is an unborn child; provided, however, that such testimony shall not be admissible in any civil or criminal action against such witness and such witness shall forever be exempt from any prosecution for the act concerning which the witness testifies except a prosecution for perjury. SECTION 3.  Article 7, Chapter 3, Title 16 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 16-3-760.  As used in this article: (1) "Fertilization" means the fusion of a human spermatozoon with a human ovum. (2) "Person" includes an unborn child at every stage of development from fertilization until birth. (3) "Spontaneous miscarriage" means the natural or accidental termination of pregnancy and the expulsion of the unborn child. Section 16-3-761.  Where the victim is an unborn child and the defendant is the child's mother, it is a defense to prosecution under this article that the mother engaged in the proscribed conduct because she was compelled to do so by the threat of imminent death or great bodily injury. Section 16-3-762.  In a prosecution under this article where the victim is an unborn child, unless specifically provided otherwise: (1) enforcement is subject to the same presumptions, defenses, justifications, laws of parties, immunities, and clemencies as would apply to the homicide of a person who had been born alive; (2) solicitors and the Attorney General shall have concurrent authority to prosecute criminal cases and to perform any duty that necessarily relates to such prosecution; and (3) this article prevails over other law to the extent of any conflict. Section 16-3-763.  (A) This article shall not apply to the unintentional death of an unborn child when resulting from: (1) the undertaking of life-saving procedures to save the life of a mother when accompanied by reasonable steps, if available, to save the life of her unborn child; or (2) a spontaneous miscarriage. (B) Mistake or unintentional error on the part of a licensed physician or other licensed healthcare provider or his or her employee or agent or any person acting on behalf of the patient shall not subject the licensed physician or other licensed healthcare provider or person acting on behalf of the patient to any criminal liability under this article. Section 16-3-764.  Any person may be compelled to testify in any action or prosecution initiated pursuant to this article where the victim is an unborn child; provided, however, that such testimony shall not be admissible in any civil or criminal action against such witness and such witness shall forever be exempt from any prosecution for the act concerning which the witness testifies except a prosecution for perjury. SECTION 4.  In accordance with Section 4, Article 1 of the South Carolina Constitution, and Clause 3, Section 9, Article 1 of the Constitution of the United States, this act is prospective only and shall not apply to conduct committed prior to the effective date of this act. SECTION 5.  Section 16-3-1083, Chapter 41, Title 44, and any other existing provisions relating to prenatal homicide or assault or regulating abortion or abortion facilities are not repealed but are superseded to the extent that such provisions may conflict with or may be inconsistent with this act. SECTION 6.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----